Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7304
Gender-altering procedures; prohibited, when; considered unprofessional conduct; applicability of section.

(1) Except as provided in the Let Them Grow Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, a health care practitioner shall not perform gender-altering procedures in this state for an individual younger than nineteen years of age.

(2) The intentional and knowing performance of gender-altering procedures by a health care practitioner for an individual younger than nineteen years of age in violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be considered unprofessional conduct as defined in section 38-179.

(3) This section does not apply to the continuation of treatment using puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or both when the course of treatment began before October 1, 2023.

(4) This section does not apply to nonsurgical gender-altering procedures when such procedures are provided in compliance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 71-7305.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 17.